New York, session 2025-2026, A11161.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 8-600 of the election law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 2-a to read as follows: 3 2-a. (a) In addition to the designation of polling places required by 4 subdivision two of this section, a county board of elections may estab- 5 lish one or more portable polling locations for purposes of early 6 voting, provided that the maximum number of locations a county may 7 establish for such portable polling locations shall be determined by the 8 state board of elections based on population. The designation and 9 location of any portable polling place shall be made no later than four- 10 teen days before an election. 11 (b) Locations for portable polling locations for early voting shall be 12 selected to provide the maximum number of voters in a county with 13 adequate access to early voting, taking into consideration population 14 density, travel time to the polling place, proximity to other early 15 voting poll sites, public transportation routes, commuter traffic 16 patterns and such other factors the board of elections deems appropri- 17 ate. Such location or locations shall be included as part of the commu- 18 nication plan developed by each board of elections pursuant to subdivi- 19 sion five of this section. 20 (c) Locations for portable polling locations for early voting shall be 21 operational for no fewer than three consecutive days. 22 (d) No portable polling location for early voting established by this 23 subdivision shall replace or otherwise decrease the number of polling 24 places for early voting required by subdivision two of this section. 25 (e) For the purposes of early voting at portable polling locations, 26 any ballots cast at such portable polling locations shall comply with 27 the provisions of subdivision six of this section. 28 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 29 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02134-01-5